Washington statutes.
RCW 43.164.040

Identification of federal reforms, waivers—Measurement of progress.

(1) The department, in consultation with the department of social and health services, the department of commerce, the department of children, youth, and families, the health care authority, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the steering committee, and other stakeholders as identified by the department:

(a) Shall identify federal reforms that would help persons served by economic security for all grants access the federal benefits they need more efficiently, avoid sudden benefit cuts as their earned income increases, and move from poverty to self-sufficiency more effectively; and

(b) May apply for federal waivers and propose federal law changes to make the authorizing environment better support coordinated service delivery across programs.

(2) The department of social and health services, in consultation with the department, the department of commerce, the department of children, youth, and families, the health care authority, the workforce training and education coordinating board, the steering committee, the legislative-executive WorkFirst poverty reduction oversight task force, and other stakeholders as determined by the department, shall further develop measures and indicators of yearly progress toward poverty reduction, reducing income inequality, and achieving an equitable and inclusive economy, using the University of Washington self-sufficiency standard as a primary measure, as well as other measures already underway in the department of social and health services technical advisory group on inclusive economic recovery, and apply those measures as needed to help promote a statewide economy that is inclusive of rural areas, racially equitable, and fully inclusive of people experiencing poverty, people of color, people with disabilities, unhoused people, and other key demographics that have historically been left behind by the state economy.

[ 2024 c 92 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 92: See note following RCW 43.164.020.